Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1366.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-180 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The State Department of Education shall establish and
maintain the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program for grades
kindergarten through eight.
B. For the purposes of this section:
1. “Cohort” means a student or group of students of no more
than five who receive subject-specific high dosage tutoring in
mathematics or English language arts (ELA) and are at least one-half

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1366 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

grad e level behind in mathematics or ELA prior to participating in
the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program; and
2. “High dosage tutoring” means in-person, subject-specific
tutoring conducted by an individual employed by or contracted with a
school district participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring
Program after school hours for a minimum of three one-hour sessions
per week per cohort. Tutoring shall be conducted during a minimum
of ten (10) weeks in the fall semester and a minimum of twelve (12)
weeks in the spring semester.
C. 1. Participating school districts shall assess kindergarten
through third-grade students participating in high dosage ELA
tutoring using the screening instrument required by Section
1210.508C of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to track ELA academic
growth. Fourth- through eighth-grade students participating in high
dosage ELA tutoring shall be assessed using an assessment chosen by
the district to determine academic readiness for the next grade
level.
2. Participating school districts shall assess students
participating in high dosage mathematics tutoring using an
assessment chosen by the district to determine academic readiness
for the next grade level.
3. Results of screening instruments and assessments
administered pursuant to this subsection shall be electronically

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1366 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repo rted to the State Department of Education three times a year at
intervals determined by the Department.
D. The State Department of Education shall give priority for
participation in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program to school
districts federally designated for additional targeted support and
improvement or comprehensive support and improvement under the
Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 as reauthorized by
P.L. No. 114-95, also known as the Every Student Succeeds Act.
Participation in the program shall be approved on a first-come,
first-served basis without any limitation other than the amount of
funds available for the program and the number of school districts
that apply.
E. High dosage tutors employed by or contracted with public
school districts participating in the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring
Program shall be awarded bonuses in the following amounts:
1. One Thousand Six Hundred Dollars ($1,600.00) for each cohort
educated by a high dosage tutor per semester; and
2. One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for each academic grade
level increase in ELA or mathematics that each student within a
cohort experiences within one academic year.
F. 1. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort do not
improve by at least half a grade level in their tutored subject
within the first year of the program, the tutor shall be placed on a
conditional one-year term of participation.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1366 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort fail to
achieve half a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional
term of participation, he or she shall lose eligibility to
participate in the program. A tutor who loses eligibility pursuant
to this paragraph may be reconsidered as a high dosage tutor after
two (2) years.
3. If the students in a high dosage tutor’s cohort achieve half
a grade level of growth during the one-year conditional term of
participation, the tutor’s conditional status shall be lifted.
G. High dosage tutors shall be provided the necessary
information for each student’s subject-specific academic performance
level, as determined by the student’s current teacher of the tutored
subject.
H. 1. School districts participating in the Oklahoma High
Dosage Tutoring Program shall obtain written consent from a
student’s parent or legal guardian prior to allowing the student to
participate in high dosage tutoring.
2. If a student participating in high dosage tutoring fails to
attend a tutoring session, the tutor shall notify the student’s
school district, and the school district shall notify the student’s
parent or legal guardian.
3. If the parent or legal guardian of a student participating
in high dosage tutoring no longer wishes for the student to
participate, a student fails to attend nine high dosage tutoring
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1366 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

sess ions during a semester, or a student’s behavior during tutoring
sessions requires disciplinary action, the student may be removed
from the cohort. The performance of a student subject to the
provisions of this paragraph shall not count against the high dosage
tutor.
I. The State Board of Education shall promulgate rules to
implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 2, Chapter 359, O.S.L.
2022, as last amended by Section 2, Chapter 286, O.S.L. 2025 (70
O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6-190.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 6-190.2. A. There is hereby created in the State
Treasury a revolving fund for the State Department of Education to
be designated the “Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund”. The
revolving fund shall be a continuing fund, without legislative
appropriation, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall be
under the control and management of the State Department of
Education. Expenditures from the Teacher Empowerment Revolving Fund
shall be budgeted and expended as provided for in subsection B of
this section.
B. The State Department of Education shall utilize the funds
for the program:
1. To support public school districts that elect to participate
in assigning advanced, lead, and master teacher certificates as
outlined in Section 6-190 of this title. Funding shall be allocated
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1366 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

to s chool districts to provide the stipend amounts indicated for
advanced, lead, and master certificates as provided for in
subsection I of Section 6-190 of this title on a first-come, first-
served basis until the cash is exhausted for the school year; and
2. To support the Oklahoma High Dosage Tutoring Program created
pursuant to Section 1 of this act, subject to the stipend amounts
required by paragraph 1 of this subsection being fully funded, until
the cash is exhausted for the school year.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION
March 3, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1366 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)